Hawaii statutes.
J. Rental
Housing Revolving Fund

Note

Subpart heading amended by L 2015, c 237, §23.

§201H-201 Definitions. As used in this
subpart, unless a different meaning is clearly required by the context:

"Develop" or "development"
means the planning, financing, or acquisition of real and personal property;
demolition of existing structures; clearance of real property; construction,
reconstruction, alteration, or repairing of approaches, streets, sidewalks,
utilities, and services, or other site improvements; construction,
reconstruction, repair, remodeling, extension, equipment, or furnishing of
buildings or other structures; or any combination of the foregoing, of any
housing project. It also includes any undertakings necessary therefor, and the
acquisition of any housing, in whole or in part.

"Fund" means the rental housing
revolving fund established pursuant to section 201H-202. [L 2006, c 180, pt of
§4; am L 2015, c 237, §24]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next